Massachusetts, session 194th, H4332.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 94C is hereby amended by inserting, after section 19F, the following section:-
Section 19G. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, a pharmacist
may order, test, screen, and treat the following health conditions: influenza, streptococcal
infections, COVID-19 or any other emerging and existing public health threats identified by the
department if permitted by an order, rule, or regulation.
b) The department shall establish standard procedures for pharmacists to test, screen and
initiate treatment for qualified health conditions.
(c) A pharmacist who orders, tests, screens, or treats health conditions under this section
may use any test that may guide clinical decision making that is waived under the federal
Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments of 1988, or the federal rules adopted thereunder,
or any established screening procedure that is established via a statewide protocol.
of 2

(d) A pharmacist may delegate the administrative and technical tasks of performing a test
waived by the federal Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments of 1988 to a pharmacy
technician acting under the supervision of the pharmacist.
(e) This section prohibits the denial of reimbursement under health benefit plans for
services and procedures performed by a pharmacist that are within the scope of the pharmacist’s
license and would be covered if the services or procedures were performed by a physician, an
advanced practice nurse, or physician's assistant. An insurance carrier or pharmacy benefit
manager shall develop adequate provider and consult codes as authorized by this act for
pharmacy compensation.
of 2